Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Administrative Provisions

199.420.
Administrative functions of secretary — Personnel — Compensation and other benefits — Administrative costs.

The secretary may promulgate administrative regulations authorized by statute for the proper administration of the functions of the cabinet, including qualification for the receipt of federal funds and for cooperation with other state and federal agencies.

In the administration of KRS 199.420 to 199.670, the secretary shall cooperate to the fullest extent possible with any agency of this state or any other state of the United States.

The secretary is authorized, subject to the provisions of KRS Chapters 12, 18A, 42, 45, and 64, to appoint, fix the compensation, and prescribe the duties and powers of any officers and employees as are necessary in the performance of the secretary’s duties under KRS 199.420 to 199.670. All positions shall be filled by persons selected and appointed on a nonpartisan merit basis, in accordance with merit standards established by law. The secretary shall not employ or pay any person who is an officer or committee member of any political party organization. The secretary may delegate to any person so appointed that power and authority as the secretary deems reasonable and proper for the effective administration of KRS 199.420 to 199.670.

The secretary shall have the power and authority to elect coverage for the workers in the cabinet, under the provisions of KRS Chapter 341, and may elect coverage for these workers under the workers’ compensation law of this state. In the event the coverage is elected the payment of contributions under KRS Chapter 341 and premiums under the workers’ compensation law shall be deemed a proper cost of administration.

The salaries and expenses of the secretary and the secretary’s staff shall be considered a proper cost of administration and charged to the funds allocated to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 3; 1952, ch. 83, § 4; 1962, ch. 211, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (13) and (21); 1998, ch. 426, § 135, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 89, § 20, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 173, effective June 20, 2005.

199.430.
Witnesses and evidence — Confidential treatment of information and records.

In the discharge of the duties imposed by KRS 199.420 to 199.670 the secretary or his duly authorized representative may administer oaths and affirmations, take depositions, certify official acts, and issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses and production of books, papers, correspondence, memoranda and other records considered necessary and relevant as evidence in connection with the administration of the cabinet. Such subpoena shall be served in the same manner as a subpoena issued out of a circuit court. Witnesses subpoenaed shall be allowed mileage allowance according to KRS 421.015 for each day their attendance is actually required at a hearing.

No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing books, papers, correspondence, memoranda or other records in response to such subpoena on the grounds that the evidence required of him may tend to incriminate him or subject him to a penalty for forfeiture. No person shall be prosecuted or subjected to any suit, penalty, or forfeiture on account of any transaction, matter, or thing concerning which he or his agent or worker is compelled, after having claimed privilege against self-incrimination, to give evidence, except that such witness so testifying shall not be exempt from punishment for perjury.

All letters, reports, communications, and other matters, written or oral, to the cabinet or any of its agents, representatives, or employees, or to any board or official functioning under KRS 199.420 to 199.670, which have been written, sent, or made in connection with the requirements and administration of the cabinet shall be absolutely privileged and shall not be the subject matter or basis for any suit for slander or libel in any court, but no person testifying before the secretary or his duly authorized representative shall be exempt from punishment for perjury. Information obtained shall not be published or be open for public inspection, except to public employees in the performance of their duties, but any interested party at a hearing before the secretary or his duly authorized representative shall be supplied with information from such records to the extent necessary for the proper presentation of his case.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 3; 1952, ch. 83, § 9; 1970, ch. 92, § 65; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1980, ch. 188, § 182, effective July 15, 1980; 2018 ch. 112, § 17, effective July 14, 2018.

199.440.
Destruction of records.

The secretary may authorize the destruction of any original reports and records that have been properly recorded or summarized in the permanent records of the cabinet or are no longer considered necessary to the proper administration of the cabinet. The destruction or disposition shall be made only by order of the secretary. Any money received from the disposition of the records shall be deposited and credited to the use of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 125, § 4; 1966, ch. 255, § 189; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (21); 1998, ch. 426, § 136, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 174, effective June 20, 2005.

199.450.
Advisory councils for child welfare. [Repealed.]

199.460.
Duties of cabinet concerning child welfare. [Repealed.]

199.461.
Monthly regional, county, and statewide caseload average for social service workers — Requirement of report if average in excess of specified quantity.

As used in this section, “social service worker” means a social worker employed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Community Based Services, to provide direct casework services in foster care, child protection, juvenile services, or adult protection.

As used in this section, “active case” includes the total number of cases for which the family service worker has responsibility.

The monthly statewide caseload average for social service workers in the area of foster care, child protection, juvenile services, or adult protection shall not exceed twenty-five (25) active cases.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the department or a social service worker from handling emergencies to carry out statutory mandates. If the monthly regional, county, or statewide caseload average for social service workers exceeds twenty-five (25) active cases for ninety (90) consecutive days, the department shall report the fact to the Governor and to the Legislative Research Commission together with a description of the factors contributing thereto and shall make recommendations related thereto. The report shall include, by county and region, social service worker caseload averages; the number of established social service worker positions; and the number of vacant social service worker positions.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 285, § 1, effective July 1, 1986; 1992, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 426, § 137, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 14, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 175, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 159, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

199.462.
Criminal background investigation of applicant to provide foster care, relative caregiver services, fictive kin placement, or adoptive home, and of applicant’s adult household members — Request for conviction information — Form and fee for request — Background investigation at annual reevaluation authorized — Administrative regulation — Rap back system.

Before an applicant is approved to provide foster care or relative caregiver services to a child, considered a fictive kin placement for a child, or approved to receive a child for adoption, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall:

Require a criminal background investigation of the applicant and any of the applicant’s adult household members by means of a fingerprint check by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation; or

Request from the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet records of all conviction information for the applicant and any of the applicant’s adult household members. The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall furnish the information to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services and shall also send a copy of the information to the applicant.

The request
for records shall be in a manner approved by
the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the Justice and Public
Safety Cabinet may charge a fee to be paid by the applicant for the
actual cost of processing the request.

During a certified
adoptive or foster home’s annual reevaluation, the Cabinet
for Health and Family Services may:

Require a background investigation for each adult household member
of the certified adoptive or foster home under subsections (1) and
(2) of this section; or

Register each adult household member
of a certified adoptive or foster home under subsections (1) and (2)
of this section in the rap back system.

If a child is placed and resides in a fictive kin home for more than seventy-two (72) hours, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall take action, including but not limited to the following:

Provide information on how to recognize and report child abuse or neglect; and

Ensure that, within the first five (5) days of a child under the age of five (5) years old being placed in a fictive kin home, the fictive kin has completed a one (1) time training course of one and one-half (1.5) hours of training covering the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate an administrative regulation to implement this section.

History.
Repealed, reenact. and amend. 1988, ch. 345, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 426, § 138, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 166, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 99, § 176, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 239, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 10, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 135, § 3, effective June 29, 2017.

199.463.
Mandatory examinations for foster children. [Repealed.]

199.464.
Course for foster parents on prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma.

A foster parent who receives a child younger than the age of five (5) years for placement shall undergo a one and one-half (1.5) hour continuing education session one (1) time every five (5) years covering the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma as defined in KRS 620.020. A current qualifying foster parent shall demonstrate completion of this educational session by December 31, 2013.

The educational session required in this section shall address risk factors related to pediatric abusive head trauma, and the methods to reduce the risk of pediatric abusive head trauma in the foster or adoptive home. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric abusive head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services may promulgate an administrative regulation to implement this section.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 171, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

199.465.
Review of children placed in foster homes. [Repealed.]

199.466.
Background check of child abuse and neglect records at request of parent or legal guardian employing individual to care for minor child.

A parent or legal guardian employing an individual to care for his or her minor child may request the results of a background check of the child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet from the individual by submitting the same form and paying the same fee that would be submitted by an entity required by law to request such a background check on an employee or volunteer for the purpose of determining whether there has been a substantiated finding of child abuse or neglect for the child-care provider. The form shall contain the signature of the individual consenting to the background check.

The cabinet shall notify the individual on whom the background check was completed of the results.

If the results show no substantiated findings of child abuse or neglect on the registry for the individual, the cabinet shall send the individual a letter stating that they have no findings of substantiated abuse or neglect.

If the results show substantiated findings of child abuse or neglect on the registry for the individual, the cabinet shall send the individual the results of the search.

The cabinet shall make the form for requesting a background check of the child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet available on its Web site along with information on how to locate a child-care provider certified or licensed by the cabinet and how to request a criminal background check for a child-care provider.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to implement subsection (1) of this section.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 115, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

199.467.
Adoption of goals by secretary as to maximum number of children in foster care each fiscal year.

Pursuant to the requirements of the Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Pub. L. 96-272, the secretary for health and family services shall adopt by regulation specific goals for each fiscal year for the cabinet as to the maximum number of children, (either in absolute numbers or as a percentage of all children in foster care with respect to whom assistance is provided in that year) who, at any time during such fiscal year, will remain in foster care after having been in such care for a period in excess of twenty-four (24) months, together with a description of the steps to be taken by the state to achieve such goals.

History.
Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 190, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 426, § 139, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 177, effective June 20, 2005.